Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB45.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Contract Automatic Renewal Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Acquirer." A person who purchases or acquires a contract or business from a seller and becomes a party to a contract."Automatic renewal provision." A provision of a contract under which the contract is renewed for a specific period of more than one month, if the renewal causes the contract to be in effect for more than six months after the original effective 1234567891011121314151617 date of the contract."Consumer." A person who purchases or leases services under a contract."Contract." A written agreement for the sale or lease of a service, between a consumer and a vendor over a fixed period of time or for a specified duration. The term does not include an agreement that allows a consumer to cancel the agreement at any time and to receive upon cancellation a pro rata refund of any unearned amounts paid by the consumer."Seller." A person who sells or transfers a contract to an acquirer."Vendor." A person engaged in trade or commerce in this Commonwealth who advertises, sells, leases or offers to sell or lease a service to a consumer under a contract.Section 3. Contracts with automatic renewal provisions.(a) Disclosure required.--(1) A vendor that enters or attempts to enter into a contract in this Commonwealth which includes an automatic renewal provision shall disclose the automatic renewal provision in the contract or contract offer in boldface of a size no less than that of the surrounding text, but under no circumstances in a font size less than 10 points.(2) A contract that is amended or modified after the effective date of this paragraph shall be amended or modified to include the disclosure specified in paragraph (1).(b) Notification upon sale or acquisition of business or contract.--After the sale or acquisition of a business that is a party to a contract with an automatic renewal clause, or after the sale or acquisition of a contract with an automatic renewal clause, the acquirer shall, within 60 days, notify the consumer 20250HB0045PN0024 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the sale. The notification shall clearly indicate the change in ownership of the business or contract and provide the consumer with an opportunity to opt out of the automatic renewal provision.(c) Notification prior to contract renewal.--(1) A vendor or acquirer that is party to a contract in this Commonwealth which automatically renews for a specified period of more than one month shall provide the consumer with written or electronic notification of the automatic renewal provision. If the vendor has changed and is no longer the original vendor, the notification shall include a statement indicating the change.(2) The notification under this subsection shall be provided to the consumer no less than 30 days nor more than 60 days before the cancellation deadline under the automatic renewal provision. An acquirer shall have complied with the requirement under this paragraph if a notification under subsection (b) was provided at least 120 days before the cancellation deadline under the automatic renewal provision.(3) For a contract that is scheduled to automatically renew following the effective date of this paragraph, the vendor shall provide the consumer with notification of the automatic renewal in accordance with the requirements of this section.(d) Contents of notice.--The notification required under subsection (c) shall disclose clearly and conspicuously:(1) That unless the consumer cancels the contract before the cancellation deadline, the contract will automatically renew.(2) The cancellation deadline.20250HB0045PN0024 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The method by which the consumer may obtain details of the automatic renewal provision and cancellation procedure, whether by contacting the vendor at a specified telephone number or address, by referring to the contract or by any other method.(e) Proof of notification.--A vendor must retain proof of the notification provided to a consumer subject to a contract with an automatic renewal provision. The proof of notification shall be retained by the vendor for six years following the expiration of the term during which the notification was sent. The proof of notification may be retained in an electronic format.(f) Automatic renewal effective.--An automatic renewal provision in a contract shall be valid unless the consumer gives notice to the vendor to cancel the contract or unless the vendor fails to comply with the requirements of this section.(g) Right of rescission.--A contract that contains an automatic renewal provision in which the services have a sale price of at least $25 and which are sold or contracted to be sold to a consumer as a result of, or in connection with, a contact with or call on the consumer at the consumer's residence either in person or by telephone shall comply with the notice provisions specified in section 7 of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.Section 4. Violations.A vendor that fails to comply with the requirements of section 3 is in violation of this act.Section 5. Void provisions.An automatic renewal provision of a contract in violation of 20250HB0045PN0024 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this act is void and unenforceable in this Commonwealth.Section 6. Enforcement.A violation of this act shall constitute an unfair or deceptive trade or practice for purposes of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, and shall be subject to the penalty and enforcement provisions available to the Attorney General or a district attorney of that act.Section 7. Applicability.(a) Contracts applicable.--Except as provided in subsection (b), this act shall apply to contracts executed or renewed after the effective date of this subsection.(b) Exceptions.--This act shall not apply to:(1) A lease subject to the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951.(2) A contract subject to the act of December 21, 1989 (P.L.672, No.87), known as the Health Club Act.(3) A person or entity providing service contracts as defined in section 358 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, or an affiliate of the person or entity.(4) A person or entity regulated by the Insurance Department or an affiliate of the person or entity.(5) A contract subject to 66 Pa.C.S. Ch. 22 (relating to natural gas competition).(6) A contract subject to 66 Pa.C.S. Ch. 28 (relating to restructuring of electric utility industry).(7) A contract between a consumer and a bank, savings association, credit union, trust company, a licensee subject to 7 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to mortgage loan industry 20250HB0045PN0024 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensing and consumer protection) or an affiliate of any of these businesses, including the sale, assignment or transfer of a contract to any other business or affiliate.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0045PN0024 - 6 - 12345